Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0206.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1170c. (1) By not later than January 1, 2026, the department, in consultation with third parties including, but not limited to, this state's federally designated organ procurement organization, may develop or adopt, and make available to public schools, a model presentation on organ, eye, and tissue donation and transplantation programs. The model presentation must not exceed 1 class period and must include information about the Michigan organ donor registry. (2) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, the board of a school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of a public school academy is encouraged to provide the model presentation described in subsection (1) to students before completion of grade 9. (3) Upon the written request of a student's parent or legal guardian, the student must be excused, without penalty, from attending the presentation described in subsection (1).